Idaho statutes. Title 47 MINES AND MINING
Chapter 3 OIL AND GAS WELLS — GEOLOGIC INFORMATION, AND PREVENTION OF WASTE
ARTICLE VIII

This compact shall continue in effect until congress withdraws its consent. But any state joining herein may, upon sixty (60) days notice, withdraw herefrom.

The representatives of the signatory states have signed this agreement in a single original which shall be deposited in the archives of the department of state of the United States, and a duly certified copy shall be forwarded to the governor of each of the signatory states.

This compact shall become effective when ratified and approved as provided in article I of this compact. Any oil-producing state may become a party hereto by affixing its signature to a counterpart to be similarly deposited, certified, and ratified.

(2) Notice of approval of said compact shall be given by the governor of Idaho to the interstate oil and gas compact commission (IOGCC) and to the department of state of the United States.
(3) That the governor of the state of Idaho be and hereby is authorized and empowered, for and on behalf of the state of Idaho, to determine when and if it shall be for the best interests of the state of Idaho to withdraw from said compact, upon sixty (60) days’ notice, as provided by terms thereof, and in the event he shall determine that the state should withdraw from said compact, he shall have full power and authority to give necessary notice and take any and all other steps necessary to effect the withdrawal of the state of Idaho from said compact.

(4) The governor of the state of Idaho shall appoint one (1) representative of the state of Idaho to the IOGCC, whose duty and authority on behalf of the state of Idaho shall be as provided in said compact.